Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.527.010

School construction assistance grants—Capital improvements—Bond issue.

(1) For the purpose of providing school construction assistance grants and needed capital improvements consisting of the predesign, design, acquisition, construction, modification, renovation, expansion, equipping, and other improvements of skill centers facilities, including capital improvements to support satellite or branch campus programs for underserved rural areas or high-density areas, the state finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of $100,000,000, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance all or a part of these projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds. If the state finance committee deems it necessary to issue taxable bonds in order to comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of such taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable building construction account in lieu of any deposits otherwise provided by this section. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the director of financial management if it is determined that any such transfer to the state taxable building construction account is necessary.

(2) If any bonds authorized in this chapter have not been issued by June 30, 2025, the authority of the state finance committee to issue such remaining unissued bonds expires June 30, 2025.

[ 2023 c 473 s 202; 2008 c 179 s 202.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 473: See note following RCW 43.100A.321.